Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1032.
Certain unlawful acts particularly applicable to registrants.

It is unlawful for any person:

Who is subject to Article IV to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of W.S.

35-7-1030

;

Who is a registrant, to manufacture a controlled substance not authorized by his registration, or to distribute or dispense a controlled substance not authorized by his registration to another registrant or other authorized person;

To refuse or fail to make, keep or furnish any record, notification, order form, statement, invoice or information required under this act;

To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection authorized by this act; or

Knowingly to keep or maintain any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or other structure or place, which is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in violation of this act for the purpose of using these substances, or which is used for keeping or selling them in violation of this act.

Any person who violates this section is punishable by a civil fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00); provided, that if the violation is prosecuted by a complaint, information or indictment which alleges that the violation was committed knowingly or intentionally, and the trier of fact specifically finds that the violation was committed knowingly or intentionally such person is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.32.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of state or local law prohibiting maintenance of vehicle for purpose of keeping or selling controlled substances, 31 ALR5th 760.

§ 35-7-1033.
Unlawful acts; distribution; registration; possession; records; counterfeiting; punishment. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:

To distribute as a registrant a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II, except pursuant to an order form as required by W.S.

35-7-1029

;

To use in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a registration number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended, or issued to another person;

To acquire or obtain possession of, to procure or attempt to procure the administration of, or to obtain a prescription for, any controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge. The conduct prohibited by this paragraph includes but is not limited to:

Failing to disclose to a practitioner that the person has received the same or similar controlled substance or prescription for a controlled substance from another source within the prior thirty (30) days;

Alteration or forgery of a prescription or written order for a controlled substance; and

The use of a false name or address.

To furnish false or fraudulent material information in, or omit any material information from, any application, report, or other document required to be kept or filed under this act, or any record required to be kept by this act; or

To make, distribute, or possess any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance.

Except for a violation of subparagraph (a)(iii)(B) of this section and except as otherwise provided:

A person who is convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of violating paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, and the person may be ordered to receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before sentencing;

A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a second offense of violating paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, and the person shall be ordered to receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before sentencing;

A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a third or subsequent offense of violating paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both;

In the event a substance abuse assessment ordered pursuant to this section is provided by an entity with whom the department of health contracts for treatment services, the costs of the assessment shall be paid by the offender subject to the sliding fee scale adopted pursuant to W.S.

35-1-620

and

35-1-624

; provided however, if the assessment is ordered as a result of a felony conviction under this section, the assessment shall be conducted and costs assessed pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1301

, et seq.;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of probation imposed by a court for a violation of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section for a first or second conviction may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for the applicable offense under paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection provided the term of probation, together with any extension thereof, shall in no case exceed two (2) years.

Except as otherwise provided, any person who violates this section is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of violating subparagraph (a)(iii)(B) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.33; 2008, ch. 83, § 1; 2009, ch. 78, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a)(iii); inserted present (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c); and in (c), inserted the exception at the beginning.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, made stylistic changes in (a)(iii); inserted “or forgery” in (a)(iii)(B); inserted “Except for a violation of subparagraph (a)(iii)(B) of this section and” in the introductory language of (b); and added (d).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, in (b)(iv), substituted “payment policies” for “sliding fee scale” and deleted “and

35-1-624

” following “W.S.

35-1-620

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Double Jeopardy was inapplicable. —

Unpublished decision:

State prisoner was not entitled to habeas relief under 28 U.S.C.S. § 2241 because his Double Jeopardy Clause rights were not violated by the refusal of the Wyoming Board of Parole to hold a parole revocation proceeding while he was serving an Arizona sentence after he had absconded while on parole for convictions under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

35-7-1033

and

35-7-1031

. The Double Jeopardy Clause was inapplicable in that the prisoner was serving two separate sentences for convictions in two different states.
Vonkrosigk v. Schriro, 384 Fed. Appx. 812,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 13412

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

Reliance is not essential aspect of the “fraud” about which subsection (a)(iii) speaks

since this crime requires no victim and, therefore, no specific intent to defraud a victim other than the public at large. Cronin v. State, 678 P.2d 370,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1984); Robinson v. State, 678 P.2d 374,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 274

(Wyo. 1984).

“Prescription Fraud.” —

In a prosecution for conspiring and attempting to knowingly or intentionally acquire or obtain possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception, or subterfuge in violation of this section and §

35-7-1042

, use of the term “prescription fraud” to describe the substantive crime in instructions was not plain error. Thomas v. State, 958 P.2d 1059,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1998).

Sufficient evidence for conviction. —

See Broom v. State, 695 P.2d 640,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 459

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Lafond v. State, 2004 WY 51, 89 P.3d 324,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of lesser–included offense charge in state prosecution of narcotics defendant—Marijuana cases, 1 ALR6th 549.

Propriety of lesser–included offense charge in state prosecution of narcotics defendant—Cocaine cases, 2 ALR6th 551.

§ 35-7-1033.
Unlawful acts; distribution; registration; possession; records; counterfeiting; punishment. [Effective July 1, 2024]

It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:

To distribute as a registrant a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II, except pursuant to an order form as required by W.S.

35-7-1029

;

To use in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a registration number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended, or issued to another person;

To acquire or obtain possession of, to procure or attempt to procure the administration of, or to obtain a prescription for, any controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge. The conduct prohibited by this paragraph includes but is not limited to:

Failing to disclose to a practitioner that the person has received the same or similar controlled substance or prescription for a controlled substance from another source within the prior thirty (30) days;

Alteration or forgery of a prescription or written order for a controlled substance; and

The use of a false name or address.

To furnish false or fraudulent material information in, or omit any material information from, any application, report, or other document required to be kept or filed under this act, or any record required to be kept by this act; or

To make, distribute, or possess any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance.

Except for a violation of subparagraph (a)(iii)(B) of this section and except as otherwise provided:

A person who is convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of violating paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, and the person may be ordered to receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before sentencing;

A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a second offense of violating paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, and the person shall be ordered to receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before sentencing;

A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a third or subsequent offense of violating paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both;

In the event a substance abuse assessment ordered pursuant to this section is provided by an entity with whom the department of health contracts for treatment services, the costs of the assessment shall be paid by the offender subject to the payment policies adopted pursuant to W.S.

35-1-620

; provided however, if the assessment is ordered as a result of a felony conviction under this section, the assessment shall be conducted and costs assessed pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1301

, et seq.;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of probation imposed by a court for a violation of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section for a first or second conviction may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for the applicable offense under paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection provided the term of probation, together with any extension thereof, shall in no case exceed two (2) years.

Except as otherwise provided, any person who violates this section is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of violating subparagraph (a)(iii)(B) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.33; 2008, ch. 83, § 1; 2009, ch. 78, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-7-1034.
Penalties are additional.

Any penalty imposed for violation of this act is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.34.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1035.
Conviction or acquittal under federal law or law of another state.

If a violation of this act is a violation of a federal law or a law of another state, a conviction or acquittal under federal law or the law of another state for the same act is a bar to prosecution in this state.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.35.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1036.
Distribution to person under 18; drug free school zones.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by distributing methamphetamine or a controlled substance listed in Schedules I or II which is a narcotic drug to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(i), by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(i), or both. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by distributing any other controlled substance listed in Schedules I, II, III, to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(ii), by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(ii), or both. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by distributing any controlled substance listed in Schedule IV to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(iii), by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(iii), or both. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by distributing any controlled substance listed in Schedule V to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(iv), by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(iv), or both.

Any person who is convicted of any of the following listed offenses with regard to a controlled substance listed in Schedules I through IV shall have the penalties specified in this subsection imposed as part of the sentence and in addition to any other penalties authorized by law, if that offense was committed within any school bus as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xl) or within the boundaries of or within five hundred (500) feet of the boundaries of real property used by a school district primarily for the education of any student in any grade from kindergarten through twelfth grade:

If an adult:

For manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver in violation of W.S. 35-7-1031(a) or subsection (a) of this section:

Imprisonment for a minimum of two (2) years; and

An additional fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

For possession in violation of W.S. 35-7-1031(c) an additional fine of five hundred dollars ($500.00).

If a minor and if not sentenced to a term of imprisonment which is unsuspended:

For manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver in violation of W.S. 35-7-1031(a):

Successful completion of a drug education or rehabilitation program specified by the court;

Not less than twenty-five (25) nor more than two hundred (200) hours of community service specified by the court; and

Submission to monthly drug testing for one (1) year.

For possession in violation of W.S. 35-7-1031(c):

Successful completion of a drug education or rehabilitation program specified by the court;

Not less than twenty-five (25) nor more than one hundred (100) hours of community service specified by the court; and

Submission to monthly drug testing for six (6) months.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.36; Laws 1991, ch. 232, § 1; 1999, ch. 40, § 1; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), substituted “31-7-102(a)(xl)” for “31-7-102(a)(xix).”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

The bracketed reference has been inserted in the introductory language in (b) as it is the apparent intended reference.

Intent to deliver. —

Defendant's admission to the detective that she lit her marijuana pipe and was passing it to two other people when the deputies arrived in her trailer showed her specific intent to deliver marijuana. Hughes v. State, 2003 WY 35, 65 P.3d 378,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2003).

Incarceration justified for defendant selling drugs to youth and not accepting responsibility. —

Where the prosecutor and investigation report recommended incarceration, and there was testimony indicating that defendant had been selling drugs to young people and that he was unwilling to accept responsibility for his acts, the court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to incarceration. Yates v. State, 723 P.2d 37,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 592

(Wyo. 1986).

Evidence sufficient to prove delivery. —

Where police officers responded to a report that the odor of burning marijuana was emanating from an apartment where minors were present, defendant retrieved from her bedroom a wooden box containing a small amount of marijuana and other paraphernalia. The corporal testified that three juveniles admitted that they had smoked marijuana and defendant admitted that she supplied the drugs; the evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction for three felony counts of delivery of a controlled substance to a minor in violation of this section.
Anderson v. State, 2009 WY 119, 216 P.3d 1143,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of state statutes prohibiting sale or possession of controlled substances within specified distance of schools, 27 ALR5th 593.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Enhancing Penalty for Sale or Possession of Controlled Substances Within Specified Distance of Playgrounds. 23 A.L.R.6th 679.

§ 35-7-1037.
Probation and discharge of first offenders.

Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted of any offense under this act or under any statute of the United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs, marihuana, or stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic drugs, pleads guilty to or is found guilty of possession of a controlled substance under W.S. 35-7-1031(c) or 35-7-1033(a)(iii)(B), or pleads guilty to or is found guilty of using or being under the influence of a controlled substance under W.S.

35-7-1039

, the court, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent of the accused, may defer further proceedings and place him on probation upon terms and conditions. Any term of probation imposed under this section for a felony offense shall not exceed the maximum term of probation authorized under W.S. 7-13-302(b). Upon violation of a term or condition, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided. Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions, the court shall discharge the person and dismiss the proceedings against him. Discharge and dismissal under this section shall be without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of this section or for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime, including the additional penalties imposed for second or subsequent convictions under W.S.

35-7-1038

. There may be only one (1) discharge and dismissal under this section with respect to any person. This section shall not be construed to provide an exclusive procedure. Any other procedure provided by law relating to suspension of trial or probation, may be followed, in the discretion of the trial court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.37; 2009, ch. 78, § 1; 2015 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “or 35-7-1033(a)(iii)(B).”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “or pleads guilty to or is found guilty of using or being under the influence of a controlled substance under W.S.

35-7-1039

” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 101 § 2, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced or placed on probation pursuant to
W.S.

7-13-301

,

7-13-302

and

35-7-1037

on or after the effective date of this act."

Evidence sufficient to discharge railroad employee following guilty plea. —

See United Transp. Union (C) & (T) v. Union P. R. Co., 593 F. Supp. 1193, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 23473 (D. Wyo. 1984), aff'd, 812 F.2d 630, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 2507 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Under what circumstances should total weight of mixture or substance in which detectable amount of controlled substance is incorporated be used in assessing sentence under United States Sentencing Guideline § 2D1.1—post-Chapman cases, 113 ALR Fed 91.

§ 35-7-1038.
Second or subsequent offenses; mandatory minimum penalty for certain subsequent offenses.

Unless otherwise provided under W.S. 35-7-1031(c), any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this act may be imprisoned for a term up to twice the term otherwise authorized, fined an amount up to twice that otherwise authorized, or both. The judge may suspend part or all of the discretionary portion of an imprisonment sentence or fine under this subsection and place the defendant on probation pending successful completion, at the defendant’s own expense, of a chemical addiction evaluation or treatment program prescribed by the judge.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, an offense is a second or subsequent offense if, prior to his conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this act or under any statute of the United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, depressant, stimulant or hallucinogenic drugs.

This section shall not apply to offenses under W.S. 35-7-1031(c).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.38; Laws 1995, ch. 61, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Under what circumstances should total weight of mixture or substance in which detectable amount of controlled substance is incorporated be used in assessing sentence under United States Sentencing Guideline § 2D1.1—post-Chapman cases, 113 ALR Fed 91.

§ 35-7-1039.
Person using or under influence of controlled substance.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally uses or is under the influence of a controlled substance listed in Schedules I, II or III except when administered or prescribed by or under the direction of a licensed practitioner, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months or a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or by both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.39; Laws 2004, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “six (6) months” for “ninety (90) days,” and “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00).”

Merger. —

When appellant was convicted of possession of a controlled substance precursor with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation in violation of this section, conspiracy to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation, and two counts of child endangerment, he was sentenced to terms of six to eight years imprisonment on each of the first two counts, with the two sentences to run concurrently. Appellant was sentenced to terms of eighteen to twenty-four months on each of the last two counts, with these two sentences to run concurrently, but consecutive to the sentences on the first two charges; the district court was not required to merge the different crimes for sentencing under the Blockburger test, because the offenses were different as each required proof of an element that the other did not.
Baker v. State, 2011 WY 123, 260 P.3d 268,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982).

Stated

in

United States v. Blucher, 581 F.2d 244, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 9897 (10th Cir. 1978).

Cited

in

Dee v. State, 2008 WY 17, 177 P.3d 218,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb. 13, 2008).

§ 35-7-1040.
Planting, cultivating or processing marihuana, peyote or opium poppy.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally plants, cultivates, harvests, dries, or processes any marihuana, peyote, or opium poppy except as otherwise provided by law shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months in the county jail or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.40.

Cited

in

Dee v. State, 2008 WY 17, 177 P.3d 218,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb. 13, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality of state legislation imposing criminal penalties for personal possession or use of marijuana, 96 ALR3d 225.

§ 35-7-1041.
Distribution of liquid, substance or material in lieu of controlled substance.

Any person who in any manner offers to unlawfully sell, furnish, transport, administer, or give any controlled substance to any person, or offers, arranges, or negotiates to have any controlled substance unlawfully sold, delivered, transported, furnished, administered, or given to any person and then sells, delivers, furnishes, transports, administers, or gives, or offers, arranges, or negotiates to have sold, delivered, transported, furnished, administered or given to any person any other liquid, substance, or material in lieu of any controlled substance shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than (1) year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.41.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: recovery for injury or death resulting from intentional inhalation of product's fumes or vapors to produce intoxicating or similar effect, 50 ALR5th 275.